db/tsearch_data/dutch.affix
flag P:
   A A D	>	-AD,DEN		# braad		> braden
   A A F	>	-AF,FEN		# graaf		> grafen
   A A G	>	-AG,GEN		# laag		> lagen
   A A K	>	-AK,KEN		# draak		> draken
   A A L	>	-AL,LEN		# baal		> balen
   A A M	>	-AM,MEN		# beaam		> beamen
   A A N	>	-AN,NEN		# baan		> banen
   A A P	>	-AP,PEN		# gaap		> gapen
   A A R	>	-AR,REN		# blaar		> blaren
   A A S	>	-AS,SEN		# faas		> fasen
   A A T	>	-AT,TEN		# citaat	> citaten
   E E D	>	-ED,DEN		# Zweed		> Zweden
   E E G	>	-EG,GEN		# kreeg		> kregen
   E E K	>	-EK,KEN		# beek		> beken
   E E L	>	-EL,LEN		# beveel	> bevelen
   E E M	>	-EM,MEN		# embleem	> emblemen
   E E N	>	-EN,NEN		# scheen	> schenen
   E E P	>	-EP,PEN		# greep		> grepen
   E E R	>	-ER,REN		# beer		> beren
   E E S	>	-ES,SEN		# hees		> hesen
   E E T	>	-ET,TEN		# vreet		> vreten
   O O D	>	-OD,DEN		# bood		> boden
   O O F	>	-OF,FEN		# filosoof	> filosofen
   O O G	>	-OG,GEN		# boog		> bogen
   O O K	>	-OK,KEN		# kook		> koken
   O O L	>	-OL,LEN		# Pool		> Polen
   O O M	>	-OM,MEN		# atoom		> atomen
   O O N	>	-ON,NEN		# woon		> wonen
   O O P	>	-OP,PEN		# doop		> dopen
   O O R	>	-OR,REN		# ivoor		> ivoren
   O O T	>	-OT,TEN		# boot		> boten
   U U L	>	-UL,LEN		# moduul	> modulen
   U U N	>	-UN,NEN		# tribuun	> tribunen
   U U R	>	-UR,REN		# huur		> huren

#
# Nouns having a plural on -s.
#
flag S:
   [^S]        >	S		# appel		> appels

#
# Nouns having a plural on 's.
#
flag X:
   [^S]        >	'S		# baby		> baby's

#
# Words having an -e form.
#
flag E:
   [^E]		>	E		# vroeg		> vroege
					# toegewijd	> toegewijde

#
# Words having -(e)r(e) forms.
#
flag R:
   [E]		>	R		# grote		> groter
   [^E]		>	ER		# vroeg		> vroeger
   [E]		>	RE		# grote		> grotere
   [^E]		>	ERE		# vroeg		> vroegere

#
# Words having -st(e) forms.
#
flag T:
   .		>	ST		# vroeg		> vroegst
   .		>	STE		# vroeg		> vroegste

flag D:
   [^D]		>	D		# werken	> werkend
   [^D]		>	DE		# werken	> werkende

flag W:
    [^T]	>	T		# werk		> werkt
    [KFSTP]	>	TE		# werk		> werkte
    [KFSTP]	>	TEN		# werk		> werkten
    C H		>	TE		# lach		> lachte
    C H		>	TEN		# lach		> lachten
    [^KFSTPH]	>	DE		# antwoord	> antwoordde
    [^KFSTPH]	>	DEN		# antwoord	> antwoordden

flag H:
    .		>	HEID		# gelegen	> gelegenheid

flag I:
    .		>	ING		# bedenk	> bedenking
