db/tsearch_data/dutch.dict
aangroei/INW
aankaart/MNW
aanmonster/INW
aanschoffel/NW
aantast/IMNW
aanzwellen/D
aanzwoeg/NW
aardnoot/P
aartslui/ERT
abominabel/ERT
abonnementhouder/S
abstinent/ERT
achtervolg/DINW
adelaar/PS
administratieprogramma/X
afbetalingsstelsel/S
afblaar/PW
afdoen/DI
afgerasterd/E
afgesloten/HRT
afhamer/NW
afkaats/INW
aflood/MPW
afmarcheer/PW
afmonster/INW
afrasp/NW
afroffel/INW
afschuwwekkend/ERT
afslib/MW
afsnoei/INW
aftakel/INW
afvloei/INW
afwisselend/ERT
afzadel/NW
afzeep/PW
agent/EN
airco/X
alarmeren/D
alleseter/S
analfabeet/P
antivirusprogramma/X
apert/E
ar/EMNSW
arameeër/S
areaal/P
argwanend/EHRT
artistiek/ERT
autofocuscamera/X
autorisatie/S
avontuurlijk/ERT
azteek/P
ballerina/X
baluster/S
bangst/EN
bazel/GNW
beangstig/DINW
beargumenteer/DPW
bebouw/DINW
bedrijvig/EHRT
bedrukt/EHNRT
beestachtig/EHRT
begeleid/EIMNOW
begraas/DZ
beha/X
beklijf/DZ
beknopt/EHRT
bekoel/DINW
bekrompen/HORT
beleefd/EHNORT
beleidsparagraaf/P
belemmeren/D
belet/MW
belezen/HRT
bemoei/DINW
benedictijn/NS
beoefen/DINW
bereken/DINW
berispelijke/OR
beschaaf/DZ
beschouwelijk/ERT
besmettelijk/EHRT
bespied/EIMNW
bespikkel/DNW
bestraf/MW
bestuurslichaam/P
beticht/EIMNW
betimmer/DINW
betoon/DPW
beveiligingsprogramma/X
bevestigend/ERT
bevloei/DINW
bewandel/DNW
bewimpel/DINW
bewusteloos/H
bezield/ENORT
bezwaar/DPW
beïnvloed/IMNW
bijeenschraap/PW
bijgenaamd/E
bijhaal/PW
biljartkeu/S
binnentrekken/D
bitterzoet/ERT
blaag/P
blijmoedig/EHRT
blohartig/ERT
bobbel/IJNSW
bobbelig/ERT
body/X
boetvaardig/EHRT
bomig/ERT
bommel/NSW
boor/ADJPUW
bovenmenselijk/ERT
braad/AGKMPUW
breedvoerig/EHRT
brijachtig/ERT
bronfunctie/S
buitel/FINW
buitensporig/EHRT
bultig/ERT
camera/X
chakra/X
chambree/S
chauffeer/PW
christelijk/EHORTV
classificeer/PW
clement/E
communicatieprogramma/X
conflicteren/D
constructie/S
controlepaneel/P
corso/JX
courante/CNR
debetnota/X
declarabel/E
degradeer/PW
dein/INSW
deken/JS
dekkingsaankoop/P
dempig/ERT
diafragma/X
differente/CR
differentieerbaar/H
differentiëren/D
dilettanterig/E
directory/X
dogger/S
doldriftig/ERT
dolkstoot/P
doodmartel/NW
doorbraden/RT
doorgedraaid/E
doorstroomprogramma/X
doortintel/DNW
doorverbind/IN
draakachtig/ERT
drapeer/PW
drekkerig/ERT
dribbel/NSW
driftig/EHRT
droog/BCFHJKPUV
duinaardappel/NS
duizelig/EHRT
dwingerig/ERT
echo/JWX
economiestudent/EN
eerbiedig/EHINORTW
eervergeten/RT
eggig/ERT
emancipatoir/E
emiraat/P
ernstig/ERST
essayeur/S
evenredige/NOR
ex-tempore/X
explodeer/PW
faillissementsaanvraag/P
fantastisch/E
farao/X
fascineren/D
feestelijk/EHRT
flemerig/ERT
floppy/X
florissant/ERT
fluisteraar/S
functioneer/PW
fungeer/PW
fysiologisch/E
gap/IMNW
geassocieerd/EN
gebiedend/ERT
gebostonneerd/EN
gebruikersvriendelijk/EH
gecompliceerd/ENOR
geconcentreerd/EN
gedeprecieerd/E
gedragscode/S
gedwarsboomd/EN
gegekt/EN
geheimzinnig/EHRT
gehomologeerd/EN
geil/EHRT
gekitteld/EN
gekletter/D
gelaarsd/E
geldig/EHO
gematigde/ANR
gemoedelijk/EHRT
geneigd/EHNO
geneselijk/EO
geprospecteerd/EN
geruchtmakend/ERT
gescheurd/CEFNU
geschoold/EHNORT
gesteven/ADK
gesticuleer/PW
getalsmatig/E
gevoelig/EHORT
geweldsvideo/X
gewillig/DEHORT
gewrongen/FRTU
gezeefd/EFNU
giro/X
gloeien/ADU
gluiperig/EHRT
gnomon/S
goddelijk/EHRSTV
godsjammerlijk/ERT
goedkeur/INW
goedleers/E
graatachtig/ERT
gratig/ERT
grendel/JNSVW
grillig/EHRT
groepenautomaat/P
grootmachtig/ERT
guerrillero/X
gympie/S
handig/EFHORST
happig/EHRT
heet/GP
heethoofdig/EHRT
heiig/ERT
herderstasje/S
herinterpreteren/D
hertaxeer/PW
heruitzend/IN
hetero/X
heuglijk/EORT
heus/EHO
hospita/X
houweel/JP
huiscomputer/S
huislijk/EHORT
hulpverlenen/D
idyllisch/E
ijdel/EHRTV
impotent/ERT
incestdrama/X
indosseer/PW
inkwartier/INW
instrumenteer/PW
integratie/S
inviteer/PW
inwerkschema/X
juwelig/ERT
kabelaring/S
kalligraaf/P
kamig/ERT
kantel/FINW
karateka/X
kastanjebruin/ERT
keel/JPW
kelder/CJNSW
kenmerken/DV
kerksgezind/EH
kiezelsteen/P
kindertrauma/X
klassiek/ENRT
kleurencombinatie/S
kliervormig/ERT
kloek/EHNRTV
knikker/JNSW
kogelrond/ERT
kolfbaan/P
komma/JX
koningskaarsje/S
kooplustig/ERT
korzelig/EHRT
kosteloos/H
krevel/INW
kruimig/ERT
kruiswegstatie/S
kunstbeen/P
kwalster/NSW
kwastig/EHRT
kwistig/EHRT
lakens/E
lauwhartig/ERT
leegmaak/PW
leertouwer/S
leggen/ABCDFKUV
lelijk/CEHRTV
lensvormig/ERT
lerarenagenda/X
lodderig/ERT
logo/X
lommerhuisje/S
loom/H
loot/CGJMPUVW
losgooi/NW
loslippig/EHRT
luchtdicht/ERT
mail/INS
mama/X
masker/JNSW
mechaniseer/PW
medemenselijk/H
melig/EHRT
menora/X
merk/ABKNW
middelmatig/EHRT
mikado/X
milddadig/ERT
milieucontrole/S
mirreboom/P
mishaag/DPW
mismaakt/EHRT
monster/ABFIJNSUW
muitziek/ERT
mysterie/S
naaktfoto/X
naarstig/EHRT
nadrukkelijk/EORT
nafloot/P
nagloei/NW
neergestort/E
nota/JX
nurks/EHN
obstrueer/PW
oekaze/NS
ogen/BDF
olijfachtig/ERT
olijk/EHRT
omknel/DMW
omsingel/DINW
omwikkel/DINW
onbedacht/ERT
onbehouwen/HRT
onbeweegbaar/H
onderzoeksthema/X
ondeugdelijk/EHRT
ondienstig/ERT
oneindig/EH
ongeoefend/EHRT
onhuislijk/EHRT
onkundig/ERT
onredelijk/EHRT
ontbeer/DPW
ontbrand/EIMNW
ontgrond/EIMNW
ontleedkundig/E
ontleen/DPW
ontsluit/IN
ontstellen/D
onveilig/EHRT
onverwinlijk/EH
onwettelijk/EH
oordelen/BDV
opdirk/NW
operator/NS
opkist/IMW
opleidingsprogramma/X
opmerkenswaardig/ER
opmerkzaam/HO
oppervlakkig/EHRT
optorn/NW
orden/INW
oud-leerling/EN
ovenpaal/P
overhandig/DINW
overstem/DMW
palissadeer/PW
palter/JS
pandoer/INSW
papperig/EHRT
paprika/X
paruur/P
pergola/JX
persoon/JPS
perspectivisch/E
pietluttig/EHRT
pikantig/ERT
placebo/X
plamuur/PW
pletter/NSVW
pluizer/SU
pornovideo/X
presbyteriaan/PS
preutelaar/S
programma/JX
prollig/ERT
pronkerig/ERT
protectionistisch/E
protegeer/PW
protocolleren/D
raat/JP
race/NS
rad/EHJNT
radio/X
reclamefoto/X
redekavel/INW
regulariseer/PW
rekenmachine/S
rekrutenschool/P
rendabele/OR
resocialisatieprogramma/X
respectabel/ERT
rijden/ABCDFKUV
roekeloos/H
roerom/MS
roestbruin/ERT
rondboog/P
rondfiets/NW
rottig/EHRT
rozig/ERT
sauna/X
schaker/INS
scharrelaar/S
scheel/HJPVW
scheeloog/P
scheep/CFJKPVW
scherplang/E
scheuren/BCDFUV
schimmelkleurig/ERT
schokkend/ERT
schuttersdoelen/S
seksfoto/X
sigarenhandelaar/P
slagregen/NSW
slagvaardig/EHRT
slechte/BGNRV
sleutelroman/S
slijmerig/EHRT
slijp/AFIN
slotalinea/X
smekeling/EN
smeken/DF
snood/H
Spartaan/PS
speel/ABCFGKPSUVW
speels/EHR
spek/JMNW
spiegelreflexcamera/X
spikkelig/ERT
stak/ABCFIKNUV
standaard/NS
standaardprogramma/X
startsignaal/P
stellair/E
stevig/EHRTV
stijfhoofdig/EHRT
stoffig/EHRT
stormpje/S
stoten/ACDFGKUV
strand/AGIMNW
struis/EHN
struweel/P
subdirectory/X
taalbeoefenaar/S
talentrijk/ERT
technologisch/E
tegenspreek/P
tegenstribbel/INW
tekenprogramma/X
temerig/EHRT
tentbewoner/S
terechtstel/MW
tets/EH
toegeven/D
toekeer/PW
toekomstscenario/X
toeschietelijk/EHORT
toet/GJMNSTW
toets/CINW
torenwachter/S
transparant/ENRT
troebelachtig/ERT
troosteloos/H
truffeer/PW
tulpenstengel/S
turbo/X
uitbarst/IMNW
uitgezaveld/EN
uitjouw/INW
uitschreeuw/NW
uitvoeren/D
uitweid/IMNW
uitzinnig/EHRT
vangdraad/P
varkensachtig/ERT
veefokker/S
verafschuw/DNW
verbeten/HRT
verbijsteren/D
verbitterd/EHNRT
verbrijzel/DINW
verdom/DMW
verenig/DINW
veretter/DINW
vergaar/DPW
vergenoegd/EHNRT
vergram/DMW
verhout/EIMNW
verhul/DMW
verkiezingsthema/X
verknocht/EH
verknutsel/DNW
verlaten/HORT
verleen/DPW
verlief/DZ
verloot/MPW
verlucht/EIMNW
vernauw/DINW
verontwaardig/DINW
verpletteren/D
verschalk/INW
versier/DINW
versnipper/DINW
verstal/DIMNW
verstolen/RT
verteren/CD
vervals/INW
vervet/MW
vervloei/DNW
verwijt/IN
verwijzingsteken/S
verwissel/DINW
vest/EGIMNW
vindingrijk/EHRT
vinnig/EHRT
viriel/ERT
vlammen/ADK
vlek/BFJMW
vliegenscheet/P
vlokachtig/ERT
volkskarakter/S
voorschotnota/X
voortslepen/D
voortstuw/INW
votiefsteen/P
vredelievend/EHRT
vrijdags/E
vrolijk/EHKRSTV
vrouwonvriendelijk/EH
waardigheidsbekleder/S
waarmerk/INW
wantrouwig/EHRT
weekloon/P
weerspiegel/DINW
wegzend/IN
welgeliefd/E
welig/EHRT
wellevend/EHO
werkstation/S
wiel/IJNW
willekeurig/EHNORT
witheer/P
wrevelig/EHRT
zaaimachine/S
zandachtig/ERT
zeker/EHINOVW
zelfbewust/EH
zelfgemaakt/E
zendschema/X
zilverachtig/ERT
zoet/ACEGHJMNRTVW
zonnetafel/S
zorgdragen/D
zoutkeet/P
zwets/GNW
zwijgachtig/ERT
